Utah statutes.
70A-9a-802.   Security interest perfected before effective date.

(1)  A security interest that is a perfected security interest immediately before July 1, 2013, is a perfected security interest under this chapter as amended by Laws of Utah 2013, Chapter 215 if, when Laws of Utah 2013, Chapter 215 takes effect, the applicable requirements for attachment and perfection under this chapter as amended by Laws of Utah 2013, Chapter 215 are satisfied without further action.

(2)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 70A-9a-804, if immediately before July 1, 2013, a security interest is a perfected security interest, but the applicable requirements for perfection under this chapter as amended by Laws of Utah 2013, Chapter 215 are not satisfied when Laws of Utah 2013, Chapter 215 takes effect, the security interest remains perfected thereafter only if the applicable requirements for perfection under this chapter as amended by Laws of Utah 2013, Chapter 215 are satisfied within one year after July 1, 2013.



Enacted by Chapter 225, 2013 General Session 

Enacted by Chapter 225, 2013 General Session

